North Carolina, session 2025, SB713.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-279.30. Limitation on regulation of environmental matters by units of local
government.
(a) No unit of local government, as that term is defined by G.S. 159-44, may enact, adopt,
implement, or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or policy for the protection of the
environment or natural resources that imposes a more restrictive standard or limitation than those
imposed by State or federal law, unless otherwise specifically directed by the General Assembly.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a unit of local government from
adopting, implementing, and enforcing requirements necessary to comply with federal or State
law or a condition of a permit, certificate, or other approval issued by a federal or State agency,
provided such requirement does not exceed the scope of the authority expressly granted.
(c) The limitation established by this section shall not be construed to apply to any
ordinance, rule, regulation, or policy adopted by a unit of local where the regulations are adopted
as a condition of participation in the National Flood Insurance Program."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law. Each unit of local
government shall review and amend its ordinances, rules, regulations, and policies to ensure
compliance with G.S. 143B-279.30, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, by December 1, 2025,
after which date any non-compliant provisions remaining shall be null and void.
*S713-v-1*